Utah statutes.
39-7-114.   Installment contracts.
(1)  The creditor of a service member who, prior to entry into military
service, has entered into an installment contract for the purchase of real or
personal property may not terminate the contract or repossess the property for
nonpayment or any breach occurring during military service without an order
from a court of competent jurisdiction.
(2)  The court, upon application to it under this section, may, unless the
court finds on the record that the ability of the service member to comply
with the terms of the contract is not materially affected by reason of his
military service:
(a)  order repayment of any prior installments or deposits as a condition of
terminating the contract and resuming possession of the property;
(b)  order a stay of the proceedings on its own motion, or on motion by the
service member or another person on his behalf; or
(c)  make any other disposition of the case it considers to be equitable to
conserve the interests of all parties.
(3)  Any person who knowingly repossesses property which is the subject of
this section other than as provided in Subsection (1) is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
